Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1051
Public safety agency, defined.

Public safety agency means an agency which provides emergency services.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1021;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 33.